Washington statutes.
RCW 11.56.005

Authority to exchange.

Whenever it shall appear upon the petition of the personal representative or of any person interested in the estate to be to the best interests of the estate to exchange any real or personal property of the estate for other property, the court may authorize the exchange upon such terms and conditions as it may prescribe, which include the payment or receipt of part cash by the personal representative. If personal property of the estate is to be exchanged, the procedure required by this chapter for the sale of such property shall apply so far as may be; if real property of the estate is to be exchanged, the procedure required by this chapter for the sale of such property shall apply so far as may be.

[ 1965 c 145 s 11.56.005.]